District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.06

Release in District.

All inmates of the Workhouse and Reformatory for the District of Columbia shall be returned to and released in said District on the day of the expiration of sentence.

June 10, 1910, 36 Stat. 464, ch. 282
1981 Ed., § 24-406.
1973 Ed., § 24-406.